West Virginia, session 2026, SB996.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. ORGANIZATION AND ADMINISTRATIon §20-1-19. West Virginia state parks and state forests. (a) The state parks of West Virginia are:(1) Audra; (2) Babcock; (3) Beartown; (4) Beech Fork; (5) Berkeley Springs; (6) Blackwater Falls; (7) Blennerhassett Island Historical; (8) Bluestone; (9) Cacapon Resort; (10) Camp Creek; (11) Canaan Valley Resort; (12) Carnifex Ferry Battlefield; (13) Cass Scenic Railroad; (14) Cathedral; (15) Cedar Creek; (16) Chief Logan; (17) Droop Mountain Battlefield; (18) Fairfax Stone Historical Monument; (19) Hawks Nest; (20) Holly River; (21) Jennings Randolph Lake State Park; (21) (22) Little Beaver; (22) (23) Lost River; (23) (24) Moncove Lake; (24) (25) North Bend; (25) (26) Pinnacle Rock; (26) (27) Pipestem Resort; (27) (28) Prickett’s Fort; (28) (29) Stonewall Resort; (29) (30) Summersville Lake; (31) Teter Creek Lake State Park; (30) (32) Tomlinson Run; (31) (33) Tu-Endie-Wei (Point Pleasant Battle Monument); (32) (34) Twin Falls Resort; (33) (35) Tygart Lake; (34) (36) Valley Falls; (35) (37) Watoga; and  (36) (38) Watters Smith Memorial.(b) The state forests of West Virginia are:(1) Cabwaylingo; (2) Calvin Price; (3) Camp Creek; (4) Coopers Rock; (5) Greenbrier; (6) Kanawha; (7) Kumbrabow; (8) Panther Forest/WMA, consisting of approximately 26 acres containing park facilities; and (9) Seneca.(c) Neither the director nor any officer, employee, or agent of the Division of Natural Resources may close, change the name or the designated use of a state park or state forest without statutory authorization. ARTICLE 5. PARKS AND RECREATION. §20-5-25.   Jennings Randolph Lake State  Park. (a) Legislative findings. — The Legislature finds and declares that Jennings Randolph Lake is a significant recreational, economic, and environmental resource located in Mineral County, West Virginia, attracting visitors from across the state and surrounding region for boating, fishing, camping, hiking, and other outdoor activities. The Legislature further finds that designation of Jennings Randolph Lake as an official state park will enhance tourism, outdoor recreation, conservation, and economic development in the Potomac Highlands region and strengthen the state’s ability to coordinate investment and long-term stewardship of the area.(b) Creation of state park. — There is hereby created Jennings Randolph Lake State Park, located in Mineral County, West Virginia, to consist of those lands, waters, and recreational facilities associated with Jennings Randolph Lake that are owned by the state or made available to the state for park purposes.(c) Administration. — The Division of Natural Resources shall include Jennings Randolph Lake State Park within the West Virginia State Park system and shall administer, manage, maintain, and improve the park pursuant to the authority granted under this chapter.(d) Cooperative agreements authorized. — The Division of Natural Resources may enter into cooperative agreements, memoranda of understanding, leases, or other arrangements with the United States Army Corps of Engineers, local governmental entities, and other public or private partners as necessary to provide for the continued operation, maintenance, improvement, and public recreational use of Jennings Randolph Lake State Park.(e) Federal jurisdiction not impaired. — Nothing in this section may be construed to impair or supersede federal jurisdiction or authority over Jennings Randolph Lake, the dam, reservoir project, or surrounding federally controlled lands.(f) Development authority; rulemaking. — The Division of Natural Resources may propose rules, develop recreational facilities, improve public access, expand camping or lodging opportunities, and allocate park resources as necessary to enhance outdoor recreation and promote tourism and economic growth in the surrounding region. (g) This section shall take effect July 1, 2026. §20-5-26. Teter Creek Lake State Park. (a) Legislative findings – The Legislature finds and declares that Teter Creek Wildlife Management Area is a significant recreational, economic, and environmental resource located in Barbour County, West Virginia, attracting visitors from across the state and surrounding region for boating, fishing, camping, hiking, and other outdoor activities. The Legislature further finds that designation of Teter Creek Wildlife Management Area as an official state park will enhance tourism, outdoor recreation, conservation, and economic development in the region and strengthen the state’s ability to coordinate investment and long-term stewardship of the area. (b) Creation of state park. — There is hereby created the Teter Creek Lake State Park, located in Barbour County, West Virginia, to consist of those lands, waters, and recreational facilities associated with Teter Creek Wildlife Management Area that are owned by the state or made available to the state for park purposes.(c) Administration. — The Division of Natural Resources shall include Teter Creek Lake State Park within the West Virginia State Park system and shall administer, manage, maintain, and improve the park pursuant to the authority granted under this chapter.(d) Cooperative agreements authorized. — The Division of Natural Resources may enter into cooperative agreements, memoranda of understanding, leases, or other arrangements with the local governmental entities, and other public or private partners as necessary to provide for the continued operation, maintenance, improvement, and public recreational use of Teter Creek Lake State Park.(f) Development authority; rulemaking. — The Division of Natural Resources may propose rules, develop recreational facilities, improve public access, expand camping or lodging opportunities, and allocate park resources as necessary to enhance outdoor recreation and promote tourism and economic growth in the surrounding region. (g) This section shall take effect July 1, 2026. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home